Alaska statutes. Title 25. Marital and Domestic Relations.
Chapter 27. Child Support Services Agency.
Sec. 25.27.170.
Hearings in administrative action to establish support duty.

A person served with a notice and finding of financial responsibility is entitled to a hearing if a request in writing for a hearing is served on the agency by registered mail, return receipt requested, within 30 days of the date of service of the notice of financial responsibility.

If a request for a formal hearing under (a) of this section is made, the execution under AS

25.27.062

and

25.27.230

—

25.27.270

may not be stayed unless the obligor posts security or a bond in the amount of child support that would have been due under the finding of financial responsibility pending the decision on the hearing. If no request for a hearing is made, the finding of responsibility is final at the expiration of the 30-day period.

If a hearing is requested, it shall be held within 30 days of the date of service of the request for hearing on the agency.

Except as provided in (g) of this section, the hearing officer shall determine the amount of periodic payments necessary to satisfy the past, present, and future liability of the alleged obligor under AS

25.27.120

, if any, and under any duty of support imposable under the law. The amount of periodic payments determined under this subsection is not limited by the amount of any public assistance payment made to or for the benefit of the child.

The hearing officer shall consider the following in making a determination under (d) of this section:

the needs of the alleged obligee, disregarding the income or assets of the custodian of the alleged obligee;

the amount of the alleged obligor’s liability to the state under AS

25.27.120

if any;

the intent of the legislature that children be supported as much as possible by their natural parents;

the ability of the alleged obligor to pay.

Except as provided in (g) of this section, if the alleged obligor requesting the hearing fails to appear at the hearing, the hearing officer shall enter a decision declaring the property and income of the alleged obligor subject to execution under AS

25.27.062

and

25.27.230

—

25.27.270

in the amounts stated in the notice and finding of financial responsibility.

If the agency is establishing only a medical support order, the hearing officer shall enter a decision about the parents’ respective responsibilities for the child’s health care expenses that complies with the requirements of AS

25.27.060(c)

.

History.

(§ 29 ch 126 SLA 1977; am § 7 ch 96 SLA 1981; am § 6 ch 72 SLA 1986; am §§ 19 — 21 ch 7 FSSLA 1994; am §§ 14 — 16 ch 106 SLA 2000)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 47.23.170. Renumbered in 1990.

Administrative Code. —

For hearing procedures, see 15 AAC 5, art. 1.

For calculation of child support awards in administrative establishment or review proceedings, see 15 AAC 125, art. 1.

For administrative establishment of child support orders, see 15 AAC 125, art. 2.

For review and adjustment of support obligations, see 15 AAC 125, art. 4.

Sec. 25.27.180.
Administrative findings and decision.

Within 20 days after the date of the hearing, the hearing officer shall adopt findings and a decision determining whether paternity is established and whether a duty of support exists, and, if a duty of support is found, the decision must specify

unless a medical support order only is being established, the amount of periodic payments or sum for which the alleged obligor is found to be responsible; and

the parents’ respective responsibilities for the costs of the child’s health care; this medical support order must be in compliance with AS

25.27.060(c)

.

Liability to the state under AS

25.27.120

is limited to the amount for which the obligor is found to be responsible under (a) of this section.

A decision regarding support rendered under (a) of this section is modified to the extent that a subsequent order, judgment, or decree of a superior court is inconsistent with the decision entered under (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 29 ch 126 SLA 1977; am § 22 ch 7 FSSLA 1994; am §§ 15, 16 ch 57 SLA 1995; am § 17 ch 106 SLA 2000)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 47.23.180. Renumbered in 1990.

Administrative Code. —

For hearing procedures, see 15 AAC 5, art. 1.

For calculation of child support awards in administrative establishment or review proceedings, see 15 AAC 125, art. 1.

Sec. 25.27.190.
Modification of administrative finding or decision.

Unless a support order has been entered by a court and except as provided in AS 25.25, the obligor, or the obligee or the obligee’s custodian, may petition the agency or its designee for a modification of the administrative finding or decision of responsibility previously entered with regard to future periodic support payments. In addition, the agency may initiate a modification and grant a hearing under (c) — (e) of this section.

The agency shall grant a hearing upon a petition made under (a) of this section if affidavits submitted with the petition make a showing of good cause and material change in circumstances sufficient to justify action under (e) of this section.

If a hearing is granted, the agency shall serve a notice of hearing together with a copy of any petition and affidavits submitted on the obligee or the obligee’s custodian and the obligor personally or by registered, certified, or insured mail, return receipt requested, for restricted delivery only to the person to whom the notice is directed or to the person authorized under federal regulation to receive that person’s restricted delivery mail.

A hearing shall be set not less than 15 nor more than 30 days from the date of mailing of notice of hearing, unless extended for good cause.

Modification or termination of future periodic support payments may be ordered upon a showing of good cause and material change in circumstances. The adoption or enactment of guidelines or a significant amendment to guidelines for determining child support is a material change in circumstances, if the guidelines are relevant to the petition. As necessary to comply with 42 U.S.C. 666, a periodic modification of child support may be made without a showing of a material change in circumstances if the child support order being modified on the periodic basis has not been modified or adjusted during the three years preceding the periodic modification.

History.

(§ 29 ch 126 SLA 1977; am § 13 ch 68 SLA 1988; am §§ 101, 102 ch 87 SLA 1997; am § 16 ch 108 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 47.23.190. Renumbered in 1990.

Administrative Code. —

For hearing procedures, see 15 AAC 5, art. 1.

For calculation of child support awards in administrative establishment or review proceedings, see 15 AAC 125, art. 1.

For review and adjustment of support obligations, see 15 AAC 125, art. 4.

For licensing actions, see 15 AAC 125, art. 7.

Sec. 25.27.193.
Periodic review or adjustment of support orders.

As necessary to comply with 42 U.S.C. 666, the agency, by regulation, shall provide procedures and standards for the modification, through a three-year cycle of review or adjustment, of a support order. Regulations adopted under this section must include procedures for periodic notice of the right to request review, procedures for hearings, and standards for adjustments regarding future periodic support payments. A modification under this section may be made without a showing of a material change in circumstances.

History.

(§ 103 ch 87 SLA 1997; am § 6 ch 45 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For modification of child support order by the court, see AS

25.24.170

.

Administrative Code. —

For review and adjustment of support obligations, see 15 AAC 125, art. 4.

For licensing actions, see 15 AAC 125, art. 7.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective July 1, 2009, substituted “a three-year cycle of” for “periodic” preceding “review or adjustment”.

Sec. 25.27.194.
Processing time for modification of support orders.

The agency shall use its best efforts to process modifications of support orders under AS

25.27.190

and

25.27.193

in a manner that will result in the same average processing time for modifications that increase obligors’ responsibilities as for modifications that decrease obligors’ responsibilities.

History.

(§ 13 ch 99 SLA 1998)

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter concerning the enactment of this section by
ch. 99, SLA 1998 (SCS CSHB 375(JUD)), see 1998 House Journal
2201.

Sec. 25.27.195.
Relief from administrative order.

A clerical mistake in an administrative order issued by the agency or an error arising from an oversight or omission by the agency may be corrected by the agency at any time.

The agency may, at any time, vacate an administrative support order issued by the agency under AS

25.27.160

that was based on a default amount rather than on the obligor’s actual ability to pay.

Before an order may be corrected or vacated under (a) or (b) of this section, the agency must send notice of the intended action to the obligor and the custodian and provide an adequate opportunity for the obligor and custodian to be heard on the issue.

If an order is vacated under (b) of this section, the agency may at the same time issue a new order establishing a support amount, based on information about the obligor’s income or on the Alaska average wage standard, for periods of time covered by the previous order. Upon issuance of the new order, the agency may adjust the obligor’s account to reflect the support amounts established in the new order. In no case may the agency adjust the obligor’s account below zero.

History.

(§ 22 ch 107 SLA 1996; am §§ 7, 8 ch 45 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For effect of subsection (d) on Alaska Rule of Civil Procedure 90.3, see §§ 50 and 51, ch. 107, SLA 1996 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For hearing procedures, see 15 AAC 5, art. 1.

For administrative establishment of child support orders, see 15 AAC 125, art. 2.

For licensing actions, see 15 AAC 125, art. 7.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective July 1, 2009, in (a), deleted “on the motion of an obligor” at the end of the subsection; in (b), substituted “The” for “Upon the motion of an obligor, the” at the beginning of the subsection.

Sec. 25.27.200.
Use of standards in administrative determinations of support amounts.

In making its findings under AS

25.27.160

and in establishing and modifying amounts of periodic support payments under AS

25.27.180

and

25.27.190

, the agency shall consider the standards adopted by regulation under AS

25.27.020

and any standards for determination of support payments used by the superior court of the district of residence of the obligor.

History.

(§ 29 ch 126 SLA 1977)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 47.23.200. Renumbered in 1990.

Cross references. —

For determination of amount of child support, see Rule 90.3, Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, adopted for use by child support services agency at 15 AAC 125.010.

Administrative Code. —

For calculation of child support awards in administrative establishment or review proceedings, see 15 AAC 125, art. 1.

Sec. 25.27.210.
Judicial review of administrative decisions and actions.

Judicial review by the superior court of a final administrative decision establishing or disestablishing paternity and establishing or modifying a duty of support or amounts of support due may be obtained by filing a notice of appeal in accordance with the applicable rules of court governing appeals in civil matters. A notice of appeal shall be filed within 30 days after the decision.

The complete record of the proceedings, or the parts of it that the appellant designates, shall be prepared by the agency. A copy shall be delivered to all parties participating in the appeal. The original shall be filed in the superior court within 30 days after the appellant pays the estimated cost of preparing the complete or designated record or files a corporate surety bond equal to the estimated cost.

The complete record includes

the notice and finding of financial responsibility, the notice of paternity and financial responsibility, or the notice of and petition for an action disestablishing paternity, as applicable;

the request for a hearing;

the decision of the hearing officer;

the exhibits admitted or rejected;

the written evidence;

all other documents in the case, including decisions of the agency.

Upon order of the superior court, appeals may be taken on the original record or parts of it. The record may be typewritten or duplicated by any standard process. Analogous rules of court governing appeals in civil matters shall be followed when this chapter is silent, and when not in conflict with this chapter.

The superior court may enjoin agency action in excess of constitutional or statutory authority at any stage of an agency proceeding. If agency action is unlawfully or unreasonably withheld, the superior court may compel the agency to initiate action.

History.

(§ 29 ch 126 SLA 1977; am §§ 17, 18 ch 57 SLA 1995)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 47.23.210. Renumbered in 1990.

Cross references. —

For applicable rules of court, see Appellate Rules 601-611.

Sec. 25.27.220.
Procedure in judicial reviews.

An appeal shall be heard by the superior court sitting without a jury.

Inquiry in an appeal extends to the following questions: (1) whether the agency has proceeded without or in excess of jurisdiction; (2) whether there was a fair hearing; and (3) whether there was a prejudicial abuse of discretion. Abuse of discretion is established if the agency has not proceeded in the manner required by law, the order or decision is not supported by the findings, or the findings are not supported by the evidence.

The court may exercise its independent judgment on the evidence. If it is claimed that the findings are not supported by the evidence, abuse of discretion is established if the court determines that the findings are not supported by

the weight of the evidence; or

substantial evidence in the light of the whole record.

The court may augment the agency record in whole or in part, or hold a hearing de novo. If the court finds that there is relevant evidence which, in the exercise of reasonable diligence, could not have been produced or which was improperly excluded at the hearing, the court may

enter judgment as provided in (e) of this section and remand the case to be reconsidered in the light of that evidence; or

admit the evidence at the appellate hearing without remanding the case.

The court shall enter judgment setting aside, modifying, remanding, or affirming the decision, without limiting or controlling in any way the discretion legally vested in the agency.

The court in which proceedings under this section are started may stay the operation of the decision until

the court enters judgment;

a notice of further appeal from the judgment is filed; or

the time for filing the notice of appeal expires.

A stay may not be imposed or continued if the court is satisfied that it is against the public interest.

If further appeal is taken, the supreme court may, in its discretion, stay the superior court judgment or agency order.

History.

(§ 29 ch 126 SLA 1977)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 47.23.220. Renumbered in 1990.

Cross references. —

For court rule providing that Rules of Appellate Procedure supersede all statutory provisions on the same subject, see Appellate Rule 607.

Sec. 25.27.225.
Support payment obligations as judgments.

A support order ordering a noncustodial parent obligor to make periodic support payments to the custodian of a child is a judgment that becomes vested when each payment becomes due and unpaid.
The custodian of the child, or the agency on behalf of that person, may take legal action under AS

25.27.226

to establish a judgment for support payments ordered by a court of this state that are delinquent.

History.

(§ 9 ch 144 SLA 1984; am § 7 ch 72 SLA 1986)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 47.23.225. Renumbered in 1990.

Cross references. —

For legislative findings and purpose in enacting AS

25.27.225

—

25.27.228

, see § 1, ch. 144, SLA 1984 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 25.27.226.
Collection of past due support.

To collect the payment due, the custodian of a child, or the agency on behalf of that person, shall file with the court (1) a motion requesting establishment of a judgment; (2) an affidavit that states that one or more payments of support are 30 or more days past due and that specifies the amounts past due and the dates they became past due; and (3) notice of the obligor’s right to respond. Service on the obligor must be in the manner provided in AS

25.27.265

.
The child’s custodian, or the agency on behalf of the custodian, shall file with the court proof of service of the petition, affidavit, and notice.
The obligor shall respond no later than 15 days after service by filing an affidavit with the court.
If the obligor’s affidavit states that the obligor has paid any of the amounts claimed to be delinquent, describes in detail the method of payment or offers any other defense to the petition, then the obligor is entitled to a hearing.
After the hearing, if any, the court shall enter a judgment for the amount of money owed.
If the obligor does not file an affidavit under this section, the court shall enter a default judgment against the obligor.

History.

(§ 9 ch 144 SLA 1984; am § 11 ch 40 SLA 1985; am § 8 ch 72 SLA 1986)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 47.23.226. Renumbered in 1990.

Sec. 25.27.227.
Nature of remedies.

AS

25.27.225

and

25.27.226

provide remedies in addition to and not as a substitute for any other remedies available to the parties.

History.

(§ 9 ch 144 SLA 1984)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 47.23.227. Renumbered in 1990.

Sec. 25.27.228.
Court costs.

The court may order an obligor to pay all court costs involved in a proceeding resulting in a court order described in AS

25.27.225

, and in a proceeding under AS

25.27.226

.

History.

(§ 9 ch 144 SLA 1984)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 47.23.228. Renumbered in 1990.

Sec. 25.27.230.
Assertion, recording, and effect of lien.

The agency shall assert a lien upon the real or personal property of the obligor in the amount of the obligor’s liability if an arrearage occurs under a support order being enforced by the agency.

A lien recorded under this section has no effect against earnings, or bank deposits or balances, unless it states the amount of the obligor’s liability under this chapter and unless the lien is served in accordance with AS

25.27.240

.

The lien shall attach to all real and personal property of the obligor and be effective on the date of recording of the lien with the recorder of the recording district in which the property attached is located. A lien against earnings shall attach and be effective upon filing with the recorder of the recording district in which the employer does business or maintains an office or agent for the purpose of doing business. A lien filed at the offices of the Commercial Fisheries Entry Commission in Juneau against a limited entry permit issued under AS 16.43 is considered to have been filed against the permit in all recording districts in which the permit holder uses the permit.

Whenever a lien has been recorded under this section and there is in the possession of any person, political subdivision, or department of the state having actual notice of the lien any property that may be subject to the lien, that property may not be paid over, released, sold, transferred, encumbered, or conveyed unless

a written release or waiver signed by a representative of the agency has been delivered to the person, political subdivision, or department of the state; or

a decision has been made in a hearing held under AS

25.27.170

or by a superior court ordering release of the lien on the grounds that no debt exists or that the debt has been satisfied.

A lien arising in another state under the child support laws of that state shall be given full faith and credit in this state. The lien may be asserted in this state upon the real or personal property of the obligor in the amount of the obligor’s liability by complying with the requirements of this section.

A lien recorded under this section is a judgment lien and may be enforced by execution under AS 09.35 in the full amount of the obligor’s liability at the time of execution.

History.

(§ 29 ch 126 SLA 1977; am §§ 23, 24 ch 7 FSSLA 1994; am § 19 ch 57 SLA 1995; am § 104 ch 87 SLA 1997; am §§ 31, 32 ch 132 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 47.23.230. Renumbered in 1990. Minor word changes related to the recording of documents were made in subsections (b), (c), and (d) of this section in 1988 under sec. 42, ch. 161, SLA 1988.

Cross references. —

For purpose and findings provisions related to the 1998 amendments affecting this section, see § 1, ch. 132, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 25.27.240.
Service of lien.

The agency of this state or another state, or a party or other entity seeking to enforce a child support obligation, may, at any time after recording of a lien recorded under AS

25.27.230

, serve a copy of the lien upon any person, political subdivision, or department of the state possessing earnings, or deposits or balances held in any bank account of any nature that are due, owing, or belonging to the obligor.

A lien recorded under AS

25.27.230

shall be served upon a person, political subdivision, or department of the state personally or by registered, certified, or insured mail, return receipt requested.

History.

(§ 29 ch 126 SLA 1977; am § 105 ch 87 SLA 1997; am § 33 ch 132 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 47.23.240. Renumbered in 1990. Minor word changes related to the recording of documents were made in this section in 1988 under sec. 42, ch. 161, SLA 1988.

Cross references. —

For purpose and findings provisions related to the 1998 amendments affecting this section, see § 1, ch. 132, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.